Georgia statutes. TITLE 53 Wills, Trusts, and Administration of Estates
Article 2 Advancements

53-1-10.
Lifetime transfers.

A lifetime transfer to a beneficiary of property that is the subject of a specific testamentary gift is treated as a satisfaction if it is shown pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section that the transfer is intended to satisfy the testamentary gift.

A lifetime transfer of money or other property to a prospective heir or to the beneficiary of a demonstrative, general, or residuary testamentary gift is treated as an advancement if it is shown pursuant to the provisions of subsection (c) of this Code section that the transfer is intended to be a part of the share that the heir would inherit by intestacy or the beneficiary would take under the transferor’s will.

The intent to treat a lifetime transfer as a satisfaction or an advancement is shown only if the will provides for the deduction of the lifetime transfer or its value or if the satisfaction or advancement is declared in a writing signed by the transferor within 30 days of making the transfer or acknowledged in a writing signed by the recipient at any time.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-1-10

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article discussing concept of advancements, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

For annual survey of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 57 Mercer L. Rev. 403 (2005).

53-1-11.
Value.

Every advancement shall be valued without interest at its value at the time of the transfer unless a value or an interest rate is specified in writing at the time of acceptance or in the transferor’s will.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-1-11

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article discussing concept of advancements, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

53-1-12.
Manner of taking into account.

If a beneficiary has received a satisfaction, the beneficiary shall not receive any other property in replacement of the specific testamentary gift which is the subject of the satisfaction.

If a beneficiary has received an advancement of all or a portion of a demonstrative or general testamentary gift, the value of the demonstrative or general testamentary gift shall be reduced by the value of the advancement.

For purposes of this subsection, the term “distributable share” means the share an heir would receive under the laws of intestacy or a beneficiary would receive under the residuary clause of the transferor’s will if the value of all advancements made by the transferor during life, except satisfaction of specific testamentary gifts and advancements of demonstrative or general testamentary gifts, were added to the actual value of the transferor’s intestate or residuary estate at death. If a beneficiary has received an advancement of a residuary gift or an heir has received an advancement of an intestate share, the advancement shall be taken into account in the following manner:

If a beneficiary or heir has received an advancement that is less than the value of that person’s distributable share under the residuary clause of the transferor’s will or the laws of intestacy, the share actually distributed to the beneficiary or heir shall be charged with the advancement so that the beneficiary or heir will receive only the balance remaining of the distributable share; or

If a beneficiary or an heir has received an advancement that is equal to or in excess of the value of that beneficiary’s or heir’s distributable share, the beneficiary or heir shall receive no further share from the estate.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-1-12

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article discussing concept of advancements, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).

For annual survey of law of wills, trusts, guardianships, and fiduciary administration, see 56 Mercer L. Rev. 457 (2004).

53-1-13.
Consideration of satisfaction or advancement when recipient predeceases transferor.

Unless the writing described in subsection (c) of Code Section 53-1-10 or the testator’s will expressly provides otherwise, a satisfaction or an advancement is considered when computing the division and distribution of the transferor’s estate even if the recipient of the satisfaction or advancement fails to survive the transferor.

History.

Code 1981, §

53-1-13

, enacted by Ga. L. 1996, p. 504, § 10.

Law reviews.

For article, “The Time Gap in Wills: Shifting Assets and Shrinking Estates — Obsolescence and Testamentary Planning in Georgia,” see 6 Ga. L. Rev. 649 (1972).

For article discussing concept of advancements, see 10 Ga. L. Rev. 447 (1976).